Hawaii statutes.
[§346-17.3] Motor vehicle
insurance. The parents of a child under foster care who has obtained a
driver's license shall pay the costs of the child's motor vehicle insurance,
unless the court determines the parents to be financially unable to pay the costs,
in which case the child's insurance costs shall be paid pursuant to sections
431:10C-407 and 431:10C-410. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next